Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2573.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-1381, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1381. Driving or actual physical control while under the influence; trial by jury; presumptions; admissible evidence; sentencing; time limitation; violation; classification; definition A. It is unlawful for a person to drive or be in actual physical control of a vehicle in this state under any of the following circumstances: 1. While under the influence of intoxicating liquor, any drug, a vapor releasing substance containing a toxic substance or any combination of liquor, drugs or vapor releasing substances if the person is impaired to the slightest degree. 2. If the person has an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more within two hours of driving or being in actual physical control of the vehicle and the alcohol concentration results from alcohol consumed either before or while driving or being in actual physical control of the vehicle. 3. While there is any drug defined in section 13-3401 or its metabolite in the person's body. 4. If the vehicle is a commercial motor vehicle that requires a person to obtain a commercial driver license as defined in section 28-3001 and the person has an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more. 5. While operating a vehicle for hire as defined in section 28-9501 or while providing transportation network services as defined in section 28-9551 as a transportation network company driver as defined in section 28-9551 if the person has an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more. B. It is not a defense to a charge of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section that the person is or has been entitled to use the drug under the laws of this state. C. A person who is convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor. D. A person using a drug as prescribed by a medical practitioner who is licensed pursuant to title 32 and who is authorized to prescribe the drug is not guilty of violating subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section. E. In any prosecution for a violation of this section, the state shall allege, for the purpose of classification and sentencing pursuant to this section, all prior convictions of violating this section, section 28-1382 or section 28-1383 occurring within the past thirty-six months, unless there is an insufficient legal or factual basis to do so. F. At the arraignment, the court shall inform the defendant that the defendant may request a trial by jury and that the request, if made, shall be granted. G. In a trial, action or proceeding for a violation of this section or section 28-1383 other than a trial, action or proceeding involving a person who is driving or in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle or a vehicle for hire as defined in section 28-9501 or involving a person who is providing transportation network services as defined in section 28-9551 as a transportation network company driver as defined in section 28-9551, the defendant's alcohol concentration within two hours of the time of driving or being in actual physical control as shown by analysis of the defendant's blood, breath or other bodily substance gives rise to the following presumptions: 1. If there was at that time 0.05 or less alcohol concentration in the defendant's blood, breath or other bodily substance, it may be presumed that the defendant was not under the influence of intoxicating liquor. 2. If there was at that time in excess of 0.05 but less than 0.08 alcohol concentration in the defendant's blood, breath or other bodily substance, that fact shall not give rise to a presumption that the defendant was or was not under the influence of intoxicating liquor, but that fact may be considered with other competent evidence in determining the guilt or innocence of the defendant. 3. If there was at that time 0.08 or more alcohol concentration in the defendant's blood, breath or other bodily substance, it may be presumed that the defendant was under the influence of intoxicating liquor. H. Subsection G of this section does not limit the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing on the question of whether or not the defendant was under the influence of intoxicating liquor. I. A person who is convicted of a violation of this section: 1. Shall be sentenced to serve not less than ten consecutive days in jail and is not eligible for probation or suspension of execution of sentence unless the entire sentence is served. 2. Shall pay a fine of not less than $250. 3. May be ordered by a court to perform community restitution. 4. Shall pay an additional assessment of $500 to be deposited by the state treasurer in the prison construction and operations fund established by section 41-1651. This assessment is not subject to any surcharge. If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the county treasurer. If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the city treasurer. The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. 5. Shall pay an additional assessment of $500 to be deposited by the state treasurer in the public safety equipment fund established by section 41-1723. This assessment is not subject to any surcharge. If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the county treasurer. If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the city treasurer. The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. 6. If the violation involved intoxicating liquor, shall be required by the department, on report of the conviction, to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to section 28-3319. In addition, the court may order the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device for more than twelve months beginning on the date the person successfully completes the alcohol or other drug screening, education, evidence-based psychotherapy or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy requirements of this title and the person is otherwise eligible to reinstate the person's driver license or driving privilege. The person who operates a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device under this paragraph shall comply with article 5 of this chapter. 7. Shall be required by the department to attend and successfully complete an approved traffic survival school course. 8. At the person's option, may be ordered by the court to participate in a religious program that is approved by the court. The person's participation in a religious program must be voluntary, and the purpose of the religious program may not include any effort to coerce the person to adopt or change any religious affiliation or beliefs. J. Notwithstanding subsection I, paragraph 1 of this section, at the time of sentencing the judge may suspend all but one day of the sentence if the person completes a court ordered alcohol or other drug screening, education, evidence-based psychotherapy or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy. If the person fails to complete the court ordered alcohol or other drug screening, education, evidence-based psychotherapy or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy and has not been placed on probation, the court shall issue an order to show cause to the defendant as to why the remaining jail sentence should not be served. K. If within a period of eighty-four months a person is convicted of a second violation of this section or is convicted of a violation of this section and has previously been convicted of a violation of section 28-1382 or 28-1383 or an act in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of this section or section 28-1382 or 28-1383, the person: 1. Shall be sentenced to serve not less than ninety days in jail, thirty days of which shall be served consecutively, and is not eligible for probation or suspension of execution of sentence unless the entire sentence has been served. 2. Shall pay a fine of not less than $500. 3. Shall be ordered by a court to perform at least thirty hours of community restitution. 4. Shall have the person's driving privilege revoked for one year. The court shall report the conviction to the department.  On receipt of the report, the department shall revoke the person's driving privilege and, if the violation involved intoxicating liquor, shall require the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to section 28-3319.  In addition, the court may order the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device for more than twelve months beginning on the date the person successfully completes the alcohol or other drug screening, education, evidence-based psychotherapy or treatment program or EVIDENCE-based PSYCHOTHERAPY requirements of this title and the person is otherwise eligible to reinstate the person's driver license or driving privilege. The person who operates a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device under this paragraph shall comply with article 5 of this chapter. 5. Shall pay an additional assessment of $1,250 to be deposited by the state treasurer in the prison construction and operations fund established by section 41-1651. This assessment is not subject to any surcharge.  If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the county treasurer. If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the city treasurer. The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. 6. Shall pay an additional assessment of $1,250 to be deposited by the state treasurer in the public safety equipment fund established by section 41-1723. This assessment is not subject to any surcharge. If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the county treasurer. If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the city treasurer. The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. 7. Shall be required by the department to attend and successfully complete an approved traffic survival school course. L. Notwithstanding subsection K, paragraph 1 of this section, at the time of sentencing, the judge may suspend all but thirty days of the sentence if the person completes a court ordered alcohol or other drug screening, education, evidence-based psychotherapy or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy. If the person fails to complete the court ordered alcohol or other drug screening, education, evidence-based psychotherapy or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy and has not been placed on probation, the court shall issue an order to show cause as to why the remaining jail sentence should not be served. M. In applying the eighty-four month provision of subsection K of this section, the dates of the commission of the offense shall be the determining factor, irrespective of the sequence in which the offenses were committed. N. A second violation for which a conviction occurs as provided in this section shall not include a conviction for an offense arising out of the same series of acts. O. After completing forty-five days of the revocation period prescribed by subsection K of this section, A person whose driving privilege is revoked for a violation of this section and who is sentenced pursuant to subsection K of this section is eligible for a special ignition interlock restricted driver license pursuant to section 28-1401. P. The court may order a person who is convicted of a violation of this section that does not involve intoxicating liquor to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to section 28-3319. On receipt of the report of conviction and certified ignition interlock device requirement, the department shall require the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to section 28-3319. In addition, the court may order the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device for more than twelve months beginning on the date the person successfully completes the alcohol or other drug screening, education, evidence-based psychotherapy or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy requirements of this title and the person is otherwise eligible to reinstate the person's driver license or driving privilege. The person who operates a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device under this subsection shall comply with article 5 of this chapter. Q. A prosecution for a violation of this section involving a collision that resulted in serious physical injury or death as identified in a written accident report completed pursuant to section 28-667 must be commenced within two years after actual discovery of the offense by the state or the political subdivision having jurisdiction or discovery by the state or the political subdivision that should have occurred with the exercise of reasonable diligence, whichever first occurs. R. For the purposes of this section, "evidence-based psychotherapy" means psychotherapy services that are offered by any of the following and that integrate the best available scientific research with clinical expertise based on the context of the patient's characteristics, culture and preferences: 1. A psychologist who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 19.1 and who integrates the best available scientific research with clinical expertise based on the context of the patient's characteristics, culture and preferences. 2. a health professional who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 33 and who is authorized to engage in the practice of BEHAVIORAL health. 3. a health professional who is licensed in this state pursuant to title 32 and whose scope of practice AUTHORIZES the health professional to independently provide psychotherapy, including: (a) A psychiatric nurse PRACTITIONER who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 15. (b) A Psychiatric physician assistant who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 25. (c) A psychiatrist who is licensed PURSUANT to title 32, chapters 13 and 17. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 28-1382, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1382. Driving or actual physical control while under the extreme influence of intoxicating liquor; trial by jury; sentencing; time limitation; violation; classification A. It is unlawful for a person to drive or be in actual physical control of a vehicle in this state if the person has an alcohol concentration as follows within two hours of driving or being in actual physical control of the vehicle and the alcohol concentration results from alcohol consumed either before or while driving or being in actual physical control of the vehicle: 1. 0.15 or more but less than 0.20. 2. 0.20 or more. B. A person who is convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the extreme influence of intoxicating liquor. C. At the arraignment, the court shall inform the defendant that the defendant may request a trial by jury and that the request, if made, shall be granted. D. A person who is convicted of a violation of this section: 1. Shall be sentenced to serve not less than thirty consecutive days in jail and is not eligible for probation or suspension of execution of sentence unless the entire sentence is served if the person is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section.  A person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section shall be sentenced to serve not less than forty-five consecutive days in jail and is not eligible for probation or suspension of execution of sentence unless the entire sentence is served. 2. Shall pay a fine of not less than $250, except that a person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section shall pay a fine of not less than $500. The fine prescribed in this paragraph and any assessments, restitution and incarceration costs shall be paid before the assessment prescribed in paragraph 3 of this subsection. 3. Shall pay an additional assessment of $250. If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the monies received pursuant to this paragraph to the county treasurer. If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the monies received pursuant to this paragraph to the city treasurer. The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit the monies received in the driving under the influence abatement fund established by section 28-1304. 4. May be ordered by a court to perform community restitution. 5. Shall be required by the department, on receipt of the report of conviction, to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to section 28-3319. In addition, the court may order the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device for more than twelve months beginning on the date the person successfully completes the alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy requirements of this title and the person is otherwise eligible to reinstate the person's driver license or driving privilege. The person who operates a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device under this paragraph shall comply with article 5 of this chapter. 6. Shall pay an additional assessment of $1,000 to be deposited by the state treasurer in the prison construction and operations fund established by section 41-1651.  This assessment is not subject to any surcharge. If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the county treasurer. If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the city treasurer.  The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. 7. Shall pay an additional assessment of $1,000 to be deposited by the state treasurer in the public safety equipment fund established by section 41-1723. This assessment is not subject to any surcharge.  If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the county treasurer.  If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the city treasurer. The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. 8. Shall be required by the department to attend and successfully complete an approved traffic survival school course. E. If within a period of eighty-four months a person is convicted of a second violation of this section or is convicted of a violation of this section and has previously been convicted of a violation of section 28-1381 or 28-1383 or an act in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of this section or section 28-1381 or 28-1383, the person: 1. Shall be sentenced to serve not less than one hundred twenty days in jail, sixty days of which shall be served consecutively, and is not eligible for probation or suspension of execution of sentence unless the entire sentence has been served if the person is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section.  A person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section shall be sentenced to serve not less than one hundred eighty days in jail, ninety of which shall be served consecutively, and is not eligible for probation or suspension of execution of sentence unless the entire sentence has been served. 2. Shall pay a fine of not less than $500, except that a person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section shall pay a fine of not less than $1,000.  The fine prescribed in this paragraph and any assessments, restitution and incarceration costs shall be paid before the assessment prescribed in paragraph 3 of this subsection. 3. Shall pay an additional assessment of $250. If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the monies received pursuant to this paragraph to the county treasurer. If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the monies received pursuant to this paragraph to the city treasurer. The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit the monies received in the driving under the influence abatement fund established by section 28-1304. 4. Shall be ordered by a court to perform at least thirty hours of community restitution. 5. Shall have the person's driving privilege revoked for at least one year.  The court shall report the conviction to the department. On receipt of the report, the department shall revoke the person's driving privilege and shall require the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to section 28-3319.  In addition, the court may order the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device for more than twelve months beginning on the date the person successfully completes the alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment program or EVIDENCE-based psychotherapy requirements of this title and the person is otherwise eligible to reinstate the person's driver license or driving privilege.  The person who operates a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device under this paragraph shall comply with article 5 of this chapter. 6. Shall pay an additional assessment of $1,250 to be deposited by the state treasurer in the prison construction and operations fund established by section 41-1651. This assessment is not subject to any surcharge.  If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the county treasurer.  If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the city treasurer. The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. 7. Shall pay an additional assessment of $1,250 to be deposited by the state treasurer in the public safety equipment fund established by section 41-1723. This assessment is not subject to any surcharge. If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the county treasurer.  If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the city treasurer.  The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. 8. Shall be required by the department to attend and successfully complete an approved traffic survival school course. F. In applying the eighty-four month provision of subsection E of this section, the dates of the commission of the offense shall be the determining factor, irrespective of the sequence in which the offenses were committed. G. A second violation for which a conviction occurs as provided in this section shall not include a conviction for an offense arising out of the same series of acts. H. After completing forty-five days of the revocation period prescribed by subsection E of this section, A person whose driving privilege is revoked for a violation of this section and who is sentenced pursuant to subsection E of this section is eligible for a special ignition interlock restricted driver license pursuant to section 28-1401. I. Notwithstanding subsection D, paragraph 1 of this section, at the time of sentencing if the person is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section, the judge may suspend all but nine days of the sentence if the person equips any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device for a period of twelve months.  If the person is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section, the judge may suspend all but fourteen days of the sentence if the person equips any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device for a period of twelve months. If the person fails to comply with article 5 of this chapter and has not been placed on probation, the court shall issue an order to show cause as to why the remaining jail sentence should not be served. J. A prosecution for a violation of this section involving a collision that resulted in serious physical injury or death as identified in a written accident report completed pursuant to section 28-667 must be commenced within two years after actual discovery of the offense by the state or the political subdivision having jurisdiction or discovery by the state or the political subdivision that should have occurred with the exercise of reasonable diligence, whichever first occurs. K. A person who is convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 28-1383, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1383. Aggravated driving or actual physical control while under the influence; county jail program; annual report; violation; classification; definitions A. A person is guilty of aggravated driving or actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs if the person does any of the following: 1. Commits a violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section while the person's driver license or privilege to drive is suspended, canceled, revoked or refused or while a restriction is placed on the person's driver license or privilege to drive as a result of violating section 28-1381 or 28-1382 or under section 28-1385. 2. Within a period of eighty-four months commits a third or subsequent violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section or is convicted of a violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section and has previously been convicted of any combination of convictions of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section or acts in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section. 3. While a person under fifteen years of age is in the vehicle, commits a violation of either: (a) Section 28-1381. (b) Section 28-1382. 4. While the person is ordered by the court or required pursuant to section 28-3319 by the department to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device, commits a violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section. 5. Commits a violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section while driving the wrong way on a highway. B. The dates of the commission of the offenses are the determining factor in applying the eighty-four month provision provided in subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section regardless of the sequence in which the offenses were committed. For the purposes of this section, a third or subsequent violation for which a conviction occurs does not include a conviction for an offense arising out of the same series of acts.  The time that a probationer is found to be on absconder status or the time that a person is incarcerated in any state, federal, county or city jail or correctional facility is excluded when determining the eighty-four month period provided in subsection A, paragraph 2 and subsection E of this section. C. The notice to a person of the suspension, cancellation, revocation or refusal of a driver license or privilege to drive is effective as provided in section 28-3318 or pursuant to the laws of the state issuing the license. D. A person is not eligible for probation, pardon, commutation or suspension of sentence or release on any other basis until the person has served not less than four months in prison if the person is convicted under any of the following: 1. Subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section. 2. Subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section and within an eighty-four month period has been convicted of two prior violations of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section, or any combination of those sections, or acts in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section. 3. Subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section. E. A person who is convicted under subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section and who within an eighty-four month period has been convicted of three or more prior violations of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section, or any combination of those sections, or acts in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382 or this section is not eligible for probation, pardon, commutation or suspension of sentence or release on any other basis until the person has served not less than eight months in prison. F. A person who is convicted under subsection A, paragraph 3, subdivision (a) of this section shall serve at least the minimum term of incarceration required pursuant to section 28-1381. G. A person who is convicted under subsection A, paragraph 3, subdivision (b) of this section shall serve at least the minimum term of incarceration required pursuant to section 28-1382. H. A person who is convicted of a violation of this section shall attend and complete alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment from an approved facility or receive evidence-based psychotherapy as ordered by the court. If the person fails to comply with this subsection and is placed on probation, in addition to the provisions of section 13-901 the court may order that the person be incarcerated as a term of probation as follows: 1. For a person sentenced pursuant to subsection D of this section, for an individual period of not more than four months and a total period of not more than one year. 2. For a person sentenced pursuant to subsection E of this section, for an individual period of not more than eight months and a total period of not more than two years. I. The time that a person spends in custody pursuant to subsection H of this section shall not be counted towards the sentence imposed if the person's probation is revoked and the person is sentenced to prison after revocation of probation. J. On a conviction for a violation of this section, the court: 1. Shall report the conviction to the department. On receipt of the report, the department shall revoke the driving privilege of the person. The department shall not issue the person a new driver license within one year of the date of the conviction and, if the violation involved intoxicating liquor, shall require the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to section 28-3319.  In addition, the court may order the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device for more than twenty-four months beginning on the date the person successfully completes the alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy requirements of this title and the person is otherwise eligible to reinstate the person's driver license or driving privilege. The person who operates a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device under this paragraph shall comply with article 5 of this chapter. 2. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, shall order the person to pay an additional assessment of $250. If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the monies received pursuant to this paragraph to the county treasurer.  If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the monies received pursuant to this paragraph to the city treasurer.  The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit the monies received in the driving under the influence abatement fund established by section 28-1304. Any fine imposed for a violation of this section and any assessments, restitution and incarceration costs shall be paid before the assessment prescribed in this paragraph. 3. Shall order the person to pay a fine of not less than $750. 4. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, shall order the person to pay an additional assessment of $1,500 to be deposited by the state treasurer in the prison construction and operations fund established by section 41-1651. This assessment is not subject to any surcharge.  If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the county treasurer. If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the city treasurer. The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. 5. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, shall order the person to pay an additional assessment of $1,500 to be deposited by the state treasurer in the public safety equipment fund established by section 41-1723. This assessment is not subject to any surcharge. If the conviction occurred in the superior court or a justice court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the county treasurer. If the conviction occurred in a municipal court, the court shall transmit the assessed monies to the city treasurer. The city or county treasurer shall transmit the monies received to the state treasurer. K. On conviction for a violation of this section the defendant shall be required by the department to attend and successfully complete an approved traffic survival school course. L. After completing the period of suspension required by section 28-1385, a person whose driving privilege is revoked for a violation of subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section may apply to the department for a special ignition interlock restricted driver license pursuant to section 28-1401. M. The court may order a person who is convicted of a violation of this section that does not involve intoxicating liquor to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to section 28-3319. On receipt of the report of conviction and certified ignition interlock device requirement, the department shall require the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to section 28-3319. In addition, the court may order the person to equip any motor vehicle the person operates with a certified ignition interlock device for more than twelve months beginning on the date the person successfully completes the alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment program or EVIDENCE-based psychotherapy requirements of this title and the person is otherwise eligible to reinstate the person's driver license or driving privilege. The person who operates a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device under this subsection shall comply with article 5 of this chapter. N. The sheriff of a county with a population of less than five hundred thousand persons may establish an aggravated driving under the influence jail program.  If the sheriff establishes an aggravated driving under the influence jail program, the program may not be implemented until the state department of corrections enters into an agreement with the county board of supervisors pursuant to section 31-234 to facilitate the program. Notwithstanding subsections D and E of this section, if the violation occurs in a county that has established and implemented an aggravated driving under the influence jail program or in a county that is contiguous to a county that has established and implemented an aggravated driving under the influence jail program and the person is placed on probation, the mandatory term of incarceration that the person would otherwise serve in prison may be served in the jail of the county that established and implemented the program.  A person who is incarcerated in a county jail pursuant to this subsection is not eligible for any release, work detail or monitoring program that the person would not otherwise be eligible for if incarcerated in prison.  A county sheriff who establishes an aggravated driving under the influence jail program pursuant to this subsection shall submit an annual report to the Arizona criminal justice commission that contains the data that the Arizona statistical analysis center determines is necessary to prepare a recidivism report pursuant to section 41-2405. O. Aggravated driving or actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs committed under: 1. Subsection A, paragraph 1, 2, 4 or 5 of this section is a class 4 felony. 2. Subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section is a class 6 felony. P. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Suspension, cancellation, revocation or refusal" means any suspension, cancellation, revocation or refusal. 2. "Wrong way" means vehicular movement that is in a direction opposing the legal flow of traffic. Wrong way does not include median crossing or a collision where a motor vehicle comes to a stop facing the wrong way.END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 28-1387, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1387. Prior convictions; alcohol or other drug screening, education and treatment and evidence-based psychotherapy; license suspension; supervised probation; civil liability; procedures A. The court shall allow the allegation of a prior conviction or any other pending charge of a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 or an act in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 filed twenty or more days before the date the case is actually tried and may allow the allegation of a prior conviction or any other pending charge of a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 or an act in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 filed at any time before the date the case is actually tried if this state makes available to the defendant when the allegation is filed a copy of any information obtained concerning the prior conviction or other pending charge. Any conviction may be used to enhance another conviction irrespective of the dates on which the offenses occurred within the eighty-four month provision.  For the purposes of this article, an order of a juvenile court adjudicating a person delinquent is equivalent to a conviction. B. In addition to any other penalties prescribed by law, the judge shall order a person who is convicted of a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 to complete alcohol or other drug screening that is provided by a facility approved by the department of health services, the United States department of veterans affairs or a probation department.  If a judge determines that the person requires further alcohol or other drug education or treatment or EVIDENCE-based psychotherapy, the person may be required pursuant to court order to obtain alcohol or other drug education or treatment or EVIDENCE-based psychotherapy under the court's supervision from an approved facility or a health professional licensed in this state who provides evidence-based psychotherapy. The judge may review an education, or treatment or PSYCHOTHERAPY determination at the request of the state, the defendant or the probation officer or on the judge's initiative. The person shall pay the costs of the screening, education, or treatment or PSYCHOTHERAPY unless, after considering the person's ability to pay all or part of the costs, the court waives all or part of the costs.  If a person is referred to a screening, education or treatment facility or PSYCHOTHERAPY, the facility or the health professional shall report to the court whether the person has successfully completed the screening, education or treatment program or PSYCHOTHERAPY. The court may accept evidence of a person's completion of alcohol or other drug screening pursuant to section 28-1445 as sufficient to meet the requirements of this section or section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 or may order the person to complete additional alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment programs or evidence-based psychotherapy. If a person has previously been ordered to complete an alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy pursuant to this section, the judge shall order the person to complete an alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy unless the court determines that alternative sanctions are more appropriate. C. After a person who is sentenced pursuant to section 28-1381, subsection I has served twenty-four consecutive hours in jail or after a person who is sentenced pursuant to section 28-1381, subsection K or section 28-1382, subsection D or E has served forty-eight consecutive hours in jail and after the court receives confirmation that the person is employed or is a student, the court shall provide in the sentence that the defendant, if the defendant is employed or is a student and can continue the defendant's employment or schooling, may continue the employment or schooling for not more than twelve hours a day nor more than six days a week, unless the court finds good cause to not allow the release and places those findings on the record.  The person shall spend the remaining day, days or parts of days in jail until the sentence is served and shall be allowed out of jail only long enough to complete the actual hours of employment or schooling. D. Unless the license of a person convicted under section 28-1381 or 28-1382 has been or is suspended pursuant to section 28-1321 or 28-1385, the department on receipt of the abstract of conviction of a violation of section 28-1381 or 28-1382 shall suspend the license of the affected person for not less than ninety consecutive days. E. When the department receives notification that the person meets the criteria provided in section 28-1385, subsection I, the department shall suspend the driving privileges of the person for not less than thirty consecutive days and shall restrict the person's driving privileges as described in section 28-144 for not less than sixty consecutive additional days. F. If a person is placed on probation for violating section 28-1381 or 28-1382, the probation shall be supervised unless the court finds that supervised probation is not necessary or the court does not have supervisory probation services. G. Any political subdivision processing or using the services of a person ordered to perform community restitution pursuant to section 28-1381 or 28-1382 does not incur any civil liability to the person ordered to perform community restitution as a result of these activities unless the political subdivision or its agent or employee acts with gross negligence. H. The court may order alternative sanctions to community restitution that is ordered pursuant to section 28-1381, subsection K or section 28-1382, subsection E if the court determines that education, treatment or other alternative sanctions are more appropriate.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 28-1461, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1461. Use of certified ignition interlock devices; reporting A. If a person's driving privilege is limited pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-3319 or restricted pursuant to section 28-1402: 1. The person shall: (a) Pay the costs for installation and maintenance of the certified ignition interlock device. (b) Provide proof to the department of installation of a functioning certified ignition interlock device in each motor vehicle operated by the person. (c) Provide proof of compliance to the department at least once every ninety days during the period the person is ordered to use an ignition interlock device. (d) Provide proof of calibration of the certified ignition interlock device to the department at least once every ninety days during the period the person is ordered to use an ignition interlock device. 2. The department shall not reinstate the person's driving privilege or issue a special ignition interlock restricted driver license until the person has installed a functioning certified ignition interlock device in each motor vehicle operated by the person and has provided proof of installation to the department. B. While a person maintains a functioning certified ignition interlock device in a vehicle pursuant to this chapter, the ignition interlock manufacturer shall electronically provide the following information to the department in the manner and format prescribed by the department in rule, and the department shall reject any information that does not meet these requirements: 1. Any tampering or circumvention. 2. Any failure to provide proof of compliance or inspection of the certified ignition interlock device as prescribed in this section. 3. Any attempt to operate the vehicle with an alcohol concentration exceeding the presumptive limit as prescribed in section 28-1381, subsection G, paragraph 3 or, if the person is under twenty-one years of age, any attempt to operate the vehicle with any spirituous liquor in the person's body. 4. Each time that a person fails to properly perform any set of three consecutive rolling retests that occur during a drive cycle. C. If the person is under eighteen years of age, the ignition interlock service provider, if requested by the person's parent or legal guardian, shall provide to the person's parent or legal guardian the information prescribed in subsection B of this section. D. On request, the ignition interlock manufacturer shall provide the information prescribed in subsection B of this section to: 1. The department of health services authorized provider. 2. The probation department that is providing alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment to the person. 3. The physician, psychologist, physician assistant, registered nurse practitioner or addiction counselor who is evaluating the person's ability to safely operate a motor vehicle following a revocation of the person's driving privilege as prescribed in section 28-3315, subsection D. 4. The court. 5. The licensed health professional who is providing evidence-based PSYCHOTHERAPY to the person. E. The department shall extend an ignition interlock restricted or limited driver license and the certified ignition interlock device period for six months if the department has reasonable grounds to believe that any of the following applies: 1. The person tampered with or circumvented the certified ignition interlock device. 2. The person attempted to operate the vehicle with an alcohol concentration exceeding the presumptive limit as prescribed in section 28-1381, subsection G, paragraph 3, two or more times during the period of license restriction or limitation. 3. If the person is under twenty-one years of age, the person attempted to operate the vehicle with any spirituous liquor in the person's body during the period of license restriction or limitation. 4. The person failed to provide proof of compliance or inspection as prescribed in this section. 5. The person attempts to operate the vehicle with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more during a six month extension pursuant to this subsection. 6. The person fails to properly perform any set of three consecutive rolling retests that occur during a drive cycle. F. If the special ignition interlock restricted license is extended pursuant to subsection E of this section, the limitations prescribed in sections 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 and 28-3319 do not begin until the restrictive period of the license ends. G. The department shall make a notation on the driving record of a person whose driving privilege is limited pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383, 28-1385 or 28-3319 or restricted pursuant to section 28-1402 that states that the person shall not operate a motor vehicle unless it is equipped with a certified ignition interlock device.  Unless the person is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383, the notation may not include any mark, color change or other notation or indication on the person's physical driver license. H. Proof of compliance does not include a skipped or missed random sample if the motor vehicle's ignition is off at the time of the skipped or missed sample.END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 28-3319, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3319. Action after license suspension, revocation or denial for driving under the influence or refusal of test; ignition interlock device requirement; definitions A. If, pursuant to section 28-1321, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383, 28-3320 or 28-3322, the license of a driver or the driving privilege of a nonresident is suspended or revoked, the department shall not terminate the suspension or revocation or issue a special ignition interlock restricted driver license, if applicable, pursuant to chapter 4, article 3.1 of this title until the person provides proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 9, article 3 of this title. B. If, pursuant to section 28-1321, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383, 28-3320 or 28-3322, an unlicensed resident is denied a license or permit to operate a motor vehicle, the department shall not issue a license or permit until the person provides proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 9, article 3 of this title. C. If a person whose license or driving privilege is suspended or revoked pursuant to section 28-1321, 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-1385 is ordered, pursuant to section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-1385, to attend alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment or evidence-based psychotherapy, the department shall not either: 1. Terminate the suspension or issue a special ignition interlock restricted driver license, if applicable, pursuant to chapter 4, article 3.1 of this title until the person or licensed treatment facility provides proof that the person has completed or is participating satisfactorily in alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment or evidence-based psychotherapy. 2. Issue a new license or a special ignition interlock restricted driver license, if applicable, pursuant to chapter 4, article 3.1 of this title to operate a motor vehicle after the revocation until the person or licensed treatment facility provides proof that the person has completed or is SATISFACTORILY participating in the court-ordered program. D. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, on receipt of a report of conviction from a court for a violation that involved intoxicating liquor or that specifically requires the installation of a certified ignition interlock device, the department shall require any motor vehicle the convicted person operates to be equipped with a functioning certified ignition interlock device and the convicted person to meet the requirements prescribed in section 28-1461 as follows: 1. For twelve months if: (a) Except as provided in subsection G H of this section, the person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1381, section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 1 or section 28-1383, subsection A, paragraph 3, subdivision (a). (b) The department determines that within a period of eighty-four months the person is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of section 28-1381 or section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 1 with a prior conviction of a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 or an act in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383. 2. For eighteen months if the person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 2. 3. For twenty-four months if: (a) The person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1382, subsection A, paragraph 2 and the department determines that within a period of eighty-four months the person has a prior conviction of a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 or an act in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383. (b) The person is convicted of a violation of section 28-1383, subsection A, paragraph 1, 2, 4 or 5 or paragraph 3, subdivision (b). E. If a person is required to equip a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to subsection D of this section and the person has a medical condition that prevents the person from using the certified ignition interlock device during the entire time period required by subsection D of this section, the department of transportation shall require monthly alcohol and drug screening instead of the certified ignition interlock device for the time period prescribed by subsection D of this section. The department of transportation shall require evidence of the medical condition that is satisfactory to the department of TRANSPORTATION and in a manner prescribed by the department of transportation from an authorized physician as defined in section 28-2409 or an authorized physician assistant as defined in section 28-2409.  The alcohol or drug screening shall be provided by a facility approved by the department of health services, the United States department of veterans affairs, a substance abuse counselor as defined in section 28-3005 or a probation department. F. The requirement prescribed in subsection D of this section begins on the date the person successfully completes the alcohol or other drug screening, education or treatment program or evidence-based psychotherapy requirements of this title and the person is otherwise eligible to reinstate the person's driver license or driving privilege. If the person is issued a special ignition interlock restricted driver license for the violations giving rise to the requirements prescribed in subsection D of this section or pursuant to section 28-1321, subsection P or section 28-1385, subsection J, the person shall be credited for the amount of time that a certified ignition interlock device is installed on the person's motor vehicle after the department authorizes the installation of the certified ignition interlock device on that person's motor vehicle. G. A person who is required to equip a motor vehicle with a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to this section shall comply with chapter 4, article 5 of this title. H. The department shall defer the remainder of the time period prescribed in subsection D, paragraph 1, subdivision (a) of this section commencing with the later of six months from the date the interlock was installed or the completion of the requirements of this subsection if all of the following apply: 1. The person is sentenced pursuant to section 28-1381, subsection I. 2. The person successfully completes an alcohol education program consisting of at least sixteen hours pursuant to section 28-1381. 3. The person has maintained a functioning ignition interlock device on all motor vehicles the person operates and has met the requirements of section 28-1461. 4. The person has not attempted to operate a vehicle with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more two or more times during the period of license restriction or limitation. 5. At the time of the offense, the person was not involved in a motor vehicle accident that resulted in physical injury or property damage. 6. All necessary compliance information has been provided to the department by the ignition interlock device provider, the alcohol screening program and the alcohol education program. I. The deferment pursuant to subsection H of this section is permanent, unless the person is arrested for a violation of section 28-1381, 28-1382 or 28-1383 that occurs during the period of the deferment. If the person is arrested as described in this subsection, the department shall revoke the deferment and require the person to complete the remainder of the time period prescribed in subsection D, paragraph 1, subdivision (a) of this section. J. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall reduce the length of time that a person is required to have a functioning certified ignition interlock device installed in a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection D of this section by the length of time that the person is incarcerated in a jail or prison facility for a violation of section 28-1381 or 28-1383 that did not involve intoxicating liquor. K. For the purposes of this section: , 1. "Certified ignition interlock device" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-1301. 2. "evidence-based PSYCHOTHERAPY" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-1381. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.